Washington statutes.
RCW 11.80.090

Hearing—Distribution—Bond of distributees.

If it shall appear to the satisfaction of the court upon the hearing of the application for provisional distribution that the absentee has been absent and his or her whereabouts unknown for the space of five years, or there are strong presumptions that he or she is dead, the court shall enter an order directing that the property in the hands of the trustee shall be provisionally distributed to the presumptive heirs, or to the devisees and legatees under the will, as the case may be, upon condition that such heirs, devisees, and legatees respectively give and file in the court bonds with good and sufficient surety to be approved by the court, conditioned for the return of or accounting for the property provisionally distributed in case the absentee shall return and demand the same, which bonds shall be respectively in twice the amount of the value of the personal property distributed, and in ten times the amount of estimated annual rents, issues, and profits of any real property so provisionally distributed.

[ 2010 c 8 s 2083; 1965 c 145 s 11.80.090. Prior: 1915 c 39 s 8; RRS s 1715-8.]